Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-269
Limitations on distributions.

A limited partnership shall not make a distribution to a partner to the extent that at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specific property of the limited partnership, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets, except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the limited partnership only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 37;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 42.